Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [181.995] EMPLOYMENT OF UNAUTHORIZED INDIVIDUALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor and industry. new text end new text begin (c) "Employee" means a person who performs services for hire in Minnesota for an employer. Employee does not include an independent contractor. new text end new text begin (d) "Employer" means a person or entity that employs one or more employees in Minnesota and includes the state and any political subdivision of the state. new text end new text begin (e) "License" means any permit, registration, certification, or other form of approval authorized by statute or rule to be issued by the state or a political subdivision of the state as a condition of doing business in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (f) "Unauthorized individual" means an individual who does not have the legal right or authorization under federal law to work in the United States as described in United States Code, title 8, section 1324a(h)(3). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin No employer shall knowingly employ an unauthorized individual as an employee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Investigations. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall investigate possible violations of this section whenever the commissioner has cause to believe that a violation has occurred, either on the basis of a report of a suspected violation or on the basis of any other credible information, including violations found during the course of an investigation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement; penalty. new text end new text begin (a) Upon a violation of this section, the commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) order the employer to terminate the employment of all unauthorized individuals; and new text end new text begin (2) direct the applicable agencies to suspend all licenses held by the employer for up to 14 business days. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may issue a penalty to the employer of not less than $1,000 and not more than $10,000 per violation of this section. new text end new text begin (c) In determining the length of a license suspension and the amount of any penalty, the commissioner shall consider any prior misconduct by the employer, the duration of the violation, the number of unauthorized individuals employed by the employer, and other relevant factors. new text end new text begin (d) For the purposes of this section, proof of verifying the employment authorization of an employee through the e-verify program creates a rebuttable presumption that an employer did not knowingly employ an unauthorized individual. new text end